tr: Engelli scooter'ı tipi: 3 tekerlekli; 4 tekerlekli; Katlanır/Taşınabilir; Ağır hizmet (bariatrik); Seyahat; Diğer
vi: Loại xe tay ga di động: 3 bánh; 4 bánh; Gấp/xách tay; Hạng nặng (người nặng cân); Du lịch; Khác
fr: Type de scooter de mobilité: 3 roues; 4 roues; Pliable/Portable; Résistant (bariatrique); Voyage; Autre
nl: Type scootmobiel: 3-wielen; 4-wielen; Opvouwbaar/draagbaar; Zware belasting (bariatrisch); Reizen; Andere
hu: Mozgássegítő robogó típusa: 3 kerekű; 4 kerekű; Összecsukható/hordozható; Nagy teherbírású (túlsúlyos személyek számára); Utazás; Egyéb
pt-BR: Tipo de scooter elétrico: 3 rodas; 4 rodas; Dobrável/Portátil; Serviço pesado (bariátrico); Viagem; Outro
it: Tipo di scooter per anziani e disabili: 3 ruote; 4 ruote; Pieghevole/Portatile; Robusto; Viaggio; Altro
da: Elscootertype: 3-hjulet; 4-hjulet; Sammenfoldelig/bærbar; Kraftig (bariatrisk); Rejse; Andet
zh-TW: 電動車類型: 3 輪; 4 輪; 折疊/便攜式; 重型 (肥胖症專用); 旅行; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta skutera za mobilnost: Tri kotača; Četiri kotača; Sklopivi/prijenosni; Teška kategorija (barijatrijski); Putovanje; Ostalo
pt-PT: Tipo de scooter de mobilidade: 3 rodas; 4 rodas; Dobrável/Portátil; Serviços pesados (bariátrico); Viagens; Outro
sk-SK: Typ skútra: 3-kolesový; 4-kolesový; Skladacie/prenosné; Ťažké (bariatrické); Cestovanie; Iné
ru: Тип скутера для инвалидов и пожилых людей: 3-колесный; 4-колесный; Складной/переносной; Тяжелый (бариатрический); Путешествия; Другой
fi: Invalidimopedityyppi: 3-pyöräinen; 4-pyöräinen; Taitettava / kannettava; Raskas (bariatrinen); Matkailu; Muu
el: Τύπος σκούτερ μεταφοράς: Τρίτροχο; Τετράτροχο; Πτυσσόμενο/Φορητό; Μεγάλης αντοχής (βαριατρικό); Ταξίδι; Άλλο
en: Mobility scooter type: 3-wheel; 4-wheel; Folding/Portable; Heavy-duty (bariatric); Travel; Other
pl: Typ skutera inwalidzkiego: 3-kołowy; 4-kołowy; Składana/przenośna; Wytrzymała (bariatryczna); Podróże; Inne
th: ประเภทสกูตเตอร์ไฟฟ้า: 3 ล้อ; 4 ล้อ; แบบพับ/พกพาได้; สำหรับใช้งานหนัก (น้ำหนักสูง); การท่องเที่ยว; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tip scuter pentru mobilitate: 3 roți; 4 roți; Pliabil/portabil; De mare capacitate (bariatric); Voiaj; Altele
ja: 電動カートの種類: 3輪; 4輪; 折りたたみ/ポータブル; ヘビーデューティ; 旅行; その他
ko: 전동 스쿠터 유형: 3륜; 4륜; 접이식/휴대용; 헤비듀티(비만); 여행; 기타
sl-SI: Vrsta mobilnega skuterja: 3-kolesni; 4-kolesni; Zložljiva/prenosna; Močan (bariatrični); Potovalni; Drugo
de: Typ des Elektromobils: 3 Räder; 4 Räder; Zusammenklappbar/tragbar; Schwerlastfähig (bariatrisch); Reisen; Sonstiges
cs: Typ skútru: Tříkolka; 4 kola; Skládací/přenosný; Těžký (bariatrický); Cestování; Jiné
sv: Permobiltyp: 3-hjulig; 4-hjulig; Fällbar/bärbar; Kraftig (bariatrisk); Resor; Övrigt
es: Tipo de scooter de movilidad: 3 ruedas; 4 ruedas; Plegable/Portátil; Resistente; Viajar; Otros
zh-CN: 代步车类型: 3 轮; 4 轮; 折叠/便携式; 重型（肥胖）; 旅行; 其他
bg-BG: Тип мобилен скутер: 3 колела; 4 колела; Сгъваема/преносима; Тежкотоварна (бариатрична); Пътуване; Други
lt-LT: Motorolerio judėjimo negalią turintiems žmonėms tipas: Triratis; Keturratis; Sulankstomas / nešiojamas; Didelės apkrovos (bariatrinis); Kelioninis; Kita
nb: Type mobilitetsscooter: 3-hjul; 4-hjul; Sammenleggbar/bærbar; Kraftig (bariatrisk); Reise; Annet